Washington statutes.
RCW 19.40.900

Short title.

This chapter, which was formerly cited as the uniform fraudulent transfer act, may be cited as the uniform voidable transactions act.

[ 2017 c 57 s 13; 1987 c 444 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 444: See note following RCW 19.40.011.